California statutes. Business and Professions Code
The board shall issue a certificate to practice podiatric medicine if the applicant has submitted directly to the board from the credentialing organizations verification that he or she meets all of the following requirements:

(a) The applicant has graduated from an approved school or college of podiatric medicine and meets the requirements of Section 2483.

(b) The applicant, within the past 10 years, has passed parts I, II, and III of the examination administered by the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners of the United States or has passed a written examination that is recognized by the board to be the equivalent in content to the
 examination administered by the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners of the United States.

(c) The applicant has satisfactorily completed the postgraduate training required by Section 2484.

(d) The applicant has passed within the past 10 years any oral and practical examination that may be required of all applicants by the board to ascertain clinical competence.

(e) The applicant has committed no acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a certificate under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(f) The board determines that no disciplinary action has been taken against the applicant by any podiatric licensing authority and that
 the applicant has not been the subject of adverse judgments or settlements resulting from the practice of podiatric medicine that the board determines constitutes evidence of a pattern of
 negligence or incompetence.

(g) A disciplinary databank report regarding the applicant is received by the board from the Federation of Podiatric Medical Boards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 91.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2488.

The board shall issue a certificate to practice podiatric medicine by credentialing if the applicant has submitted directly to the board from the credentialing organizations verification that they are licensed as a doctor of podiatric medicine in any other state and meets all of the following requirements:

(a) The applicant has graduated from an approved school or college of podiatric medicine.

(b) The applicant has passed either part III of the examination administered by the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners of the United States or a written examination that is recognized by the board to be the equivalent in content to the examination administered by the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners of the
 United States.

(c) The applicant has satisfactorily completed a postgraduate training program approved by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education.

(d) The applicant has passed any oral and practical examination that may be required of all applicants by the board to ascertain clinical competence.

(e) The applicant has committed no acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a certificate under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(f) The board determines that no disciplinary action has been taken against the applicant by any podiatric licensing authority and that the applicant has not been the subject of adverse judgments or settlements resulting from the practice of podiatric medicine that the board determines constitutes evidence of a
 pattern of negligence or incompetence.

(g) A disciplinary databank report regarding the applicant is received by the board from the Federation of Podiatric Medical Boards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 7.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2492.

(a) The board shall examine every applicant for a certificate to practice podiatric medicine to ensure a minimum of entry-level competence at the time and place designated by the board in its discretion, but at least twice a year.

(b) Unless the applicant meets the requirements of Section 2486, applicants shall be required to have taken and passed the examination administered by the National Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners.

(c) The board may appoint qualified persons to give the whole or any portion of any examination as provided in this article, who shall be designated as
 examination commissioners. The board may fix the compensation of those persons subject to the provisions of applicable state laws and regulations.

(d) The provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 2170) shall apply to examinations administered by the board except where those provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 93.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2493.

An applicant for a certificate to practice podiatric medicine shall pass an examination in the subjects required by Section 2483 in order to ensure a minimum of entry-level competence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 19.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2495.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board may delegate to officials of the board the authority to approve the admission of applicants to the examination and to approve the issuance of certificates to practice podiatric medicine to applicants who have met the specific requirements therefor in routine cases where applicants clearly meet the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 655, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

2496.

In order to ensure the continuing competence of persons licensed to practice podiatric medicine, the board shall adopt and administer regulations requiring continuing education of those licensees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   (AB 826)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2496.5.

Any vaccine training program provided through the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, including courses that were completed by a licensed doctor of podiatric medicine on or after January 4, 2021, pursuant to the Department of Consumer Affairs public health emergency order DCA-21-115, or any subsequent waivers that supersede this waiver, and Section 2473 shall count toward the fulfillment of the continuing education requirements governed by Section 2496.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 653, Sec. 5.   (AB 526)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2497.

(a) The board may order the denial of an application for, or the suspension of, or the revocation of, or the imposition of probationary conditions upon, a certificate to practice podiatric medicine for any of the causes set forth in Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220) in accordance with Section 2222.

(b) The board may hear all matters, including but not limited to, any contested case or may assign any such matters to an administrative law judge. The proceedings shall be held in accordance with Section 2230. If a contested case is heard by the board itself, the administrative law judge who presided at the hearing shall be present during the board’s consideration of the case and shall assist and advise the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1413, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2497.5.

(a) The board may request the administrative law judge, under his or her proposed decision in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding before the board, to direct any licensee found guilty of unprofessional conduct to pay to the board a sum not to exceed the actual and reasonable costs of the investigation and prosecution of the case.

(b) The costs to be assessed shall be fixed by the administrative law judge and shall not be increased by the board unless the board does not adopt a proposed decision and in making its own decision finds grounds for increasing the costs to be assessed, not to exceed the actual and reasonable costs of the investigation and prosecution of the case.

(c) When the payment directed in the board’s order for payment of costs is not made by the licensee, the board may enforce the order for payment by bringing an action in any appropriate court. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the board may have as to any licensee directed to pay costs.

(d) In any judicial action for the recovery of costs, proof of the board’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms for payment.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the board shall not renew or reinstate the license of any licensee who has failed to pay all of the costs ordered under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board may, in its
 discretion, conditionally renew or reinstate for a maximum of one year the license of any licensee who demonstrates financial hardship and who enters into a formal agreement with the board to reimburse the board within that one-year period for those unpaid costs.

(f) All costs recovered under this section shall be deposited in the Board of Podiatric Medicine Fund as a reimbursement in either the fiscal year in which the costs are actually recovered or the previous fiscal year, as the board may direct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 21.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2498.

(a) The board shall have the responsibility for reviewing the quality of podiatric medical practice carried out by persons licensed to practice podiatric medicine.

(b) Each member of the board, or any licensed doctor of podiatric medicine appointed by the board, shall additionally have the authority to inspect, or require reports from, a general or specialized hospital and the podiatric medical staff thereof, with respect to the podiatric medical care, services, or facilities provided therein, and may inspect podiatric medical patient records with respect to the care, services, or facilities. The authority to make inspections and to require reports as provided by this section shall not be delegated by a member of the board to any person other than a doctor of podiatric medicine and shall be subject to the restrictions against disclosure described in Section 2263.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2499.

(a) There is in the State Treasury the Board of Podiatric Medicine Fund. Commencing July 1, 2019, the Board of Podiatric Medicine Fund is renamed the Podiatric Medical Board Fund. Any reference in any provision of law to the Board of Podiatric Medicine Fund shall, commencing July 1, 2019, be deemed to refer to the Podiatric Medical Board Fund.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 2445, the board shall report to the Controller at the beginning of each calendar month for the month preceding the amount and source of all revenue received by it on behalf of the board, pursuant to this chapter, and shall pay the entire amount thereof to the Treasurer for deposit into the fund. All revenue received by the board and the division from fees authorized to be charged relating to the practice of podiatric medicine shall be deposited in the fund as provided in this section, and shall be available, upon appropriation of the Legislature, to carry out the provisions of this chapter relating to the regulation of the practice of podiatric medicine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 102, Sec. 4.   (AB 2457)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2499.5.

The following fees apply to certificates to practice podiatric medicine. The amount of fees prescribed for doctors of podiatric medicine shall be determined by the board and shall be as described below. Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be fixed by the board in amounts not to exceed the actual costs of providing the service for which the fee is collected.

(a) Each applicant for a certificate to practice podiatric medicine shall pay an application fee of one hundred dollars ($100) at the time the application is filed. If the applicant qualifies for a certificate, they shall pay a fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) Each applicant who qualifies for a certificate, as a condition precedent to its issuance, in
 addition to other fees required by this section, shall pay an initial license fee. The initial license fee shall be eight hundred dollars ($800). The initial license shall expire the second year after its issuance on the last day of the month of birth of the licensee. The board may reduce the initial license fee by up to 50 percent of the amount of the fee for any applicant who is enrolled in a postgraduate training program approved by the board or who has completed a postgraduate training program approved by the board within six months prior to the payment of the initial license fee.

(c) The biennial renewal fee shall be one thousand nine hundred dollars ($1,900). Any licensee enrolled in an approved residency program shall be required to pay only 50 percent of the biennial renewal fee at the time of their first renewal.

(d) The delinquency fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars
 ($150).

(e) The duplicate certificate fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

(f) The letter of good standing fee or for loan deferment shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

(g) There shall be a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for the issuance of a resident’s license under Section 2475.

(h) The fee for approval of a continuing education course or program shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 194, Sec. 8.   (AB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2499.6.

The fees in this article shall be fixed by the board in accordance with Section 313.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 801, Sec. 4.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2499.7.

(a) Certificates to practice podiatric medicine shall expire at midnight on the last day of the birth month of the licensee during the second year of a two-year term.

(b) To renew an unexpired certificate, the licensee, on or before the date on which the certificate would otherwise expire, shall apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and pay the prescribed renewal fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 95.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2499.8.

Any licensee who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she is unable to practice podiatric medicine due to a disability may request a waiver of the license renewal fee. The granting of a waiver shall be at the discretion of the board and may be terminated at any time. Waivers shall be based on the inability of a licensee to practice podiatric medicine. A licensee whose renewal fee has been waived pursuant to this section shall not engage in the practice of podiatric medicine unless and until the licensee pays the current renewal fee and does either of the following:

(a) Establishes to the satisfaction of the board, on a form prescribed by the board and signed under penalty of perjury, that the licensee’s disability either no longer exists or does not affect his or her ability to practice podiatric medicine safely.

(b) Signs an agreement on a form prescribed by the board, signed under penalty of perjury, in which the licensee agrees to limit his or her practice in the manner prescribed by the reviewing physician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 23. Alternative Practices and Treatments [2500. - 2501.]

2500.

The boards acknowledge the significant interest of physicians and patients alike in integrating preventative approaches and holistic-based alternatives into the practice of medicine, including, but not limited to, biopsychosocial techniques, nutrition, and the use of natural supplements to enhance health and wellness. The boards shall establish specific policies in this regard and shall review statutes and recommend modifications of law, when appropriate, in order to assure California consumers that the quality of medicine practiced in this state is the most advanced and innovative it can be both in terms of preserving the health of, as well as providing effective diagnosis and treatment of illness for, the residents of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 660, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2501.

In fulfilling their responsibilities under this article, the boards shall , on or before July 1, 2002, establish disciplinary policies and procedures to reflect emerging and innovative medical practices for licensed physicians and surgeons. The boards shall solicit the participation of interested parties in the development and preparation of these policies and procedures and shall consult technical advisors as necessary to fulfill the purposes of this article. In preparing these policies and procedures, the boards shall consult with professional medical associations and review the need for any changes in the boards’ services, procedures, and activities. The boards shall also assess the need for:

(a) Specific standards for informed consent, if any, in order for patients to be able to understand the risks and benefits associated with the range of treatment options available.

(b) Standards for investigations to assure competent review in cases involving the practice of any type of alternative medicine, including, but not limited to, the skills and training of investigators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 660, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 24. Licensed Midwives [2505. - 2523.]

2505.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Licensed Midwifery Practice Act of 1993.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2506.

As used in this article the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Board” means the Medical Board of California.

(b) “Licensed midwife” means an individual to whom a license to practice midwifery has been issued pursuant to this article.

(c) “Certified nurse-midwife” means a person to whom a certificate has been issued pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746) of Chapter 6.

(d) “Accrediting organization” means an organization approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2507.

(a) The license to practice midwifery authorizes the holder to attend cases of normal pregnancy and childbirth, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), and to provide prenatal, intrapartum, and postpartum care, including family-planning care, for the mother, and immediate care for the newborn.

(b) As used in this article, the practice of midwifery constitutes the furthering or undertaking by any licensed midwife to assist a woman in childbirth as long as progress meets criteria accepted as normal.

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a licensed midwife shall only assist a woman in normal pregnancy and childbirth, which is defined as meeting all of
 the following conditions:

(A) There is an absence of both of the following:

(i) Any preexisting maternal disease or condition likely to affect the pregnancy.

(ii) Significant disease arising from the pregnancy.

(B) There is a singleton fetus.

(C) There is a cephalic presentation.

(D) The gestational age of the fetus is greater than 3707 weeks and less than 4207 completed weeks of pregnancy.

(E) Labor is spontaneous or induced in an outpatient setting.

(2) If a potential midwife client meets the conditions specified in subparagraphs (B) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1), but fails to meet the conditions specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), and the woman still desires to be a client of the licensed midwife, the licensed midwife shall provide the woman with a referral for an examination by a physician and surgeon trained in obstetrics and gynecology. A licensed midwife may assist the woman in pregnancy and childbirth only if an examination by a physician and surgeon trained in obstetrics and gynecology is obtained and the physician and surgeon who examined the woman determines that the risk factors presented by her disease or condition are not likely to significantly affect the course of pregnancy and childbirth.

(3) The board shall adopt regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part of 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) specifying the conditions described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(c) (1) If at any point during pregnancy, childbirth, or postpartum care a client’s condition deviates from normal, the licensed midwife shall immediately refer or transfer the client to a physician and surgeon. The licensed midwife may consult and remain in consultation with the physician and surgeon after the referral or transfer.

(2) If a physician and surgeon determines that the client’s condition or concern has been resolved such that the risk factors presented by a woman’s disease or condition are not likely to significantly affect the
 course of pregnancy or childbirth, the licensed midwife may resume primary care of the client and resume assisting the client during her pregnancy, childbirth, or postpartum care.

(3) If a physician and surgeon determines the client’s condition or concern has not been resolved as specified in paragraph (2), the licensed midwife may provide concurrent care with a physician and surgeon and, if authorized by the client, be present during the labor and childbirth, and resume postpartum care, if appropriate. A licensed midwife shall not resume primary care of the client.

(d) A licensed midwife shall not provide or continue to provide midwifery care to a woman with a risk factor that will significantly affect the course of pregnancy and childbirth, regardless of whether the woman has consented to this care or refused care by a physician or surgeon, except as provided in paragraph (3) of
 subdivision (c).

(e) The practice of midwifery does not include the assisting of childbirth by any artificial, forcible, or mechanical means, nor the performance of any version of these means.

(f) A midwife is authorized to directly obtain supplies and devices, obtain and administer drugs and diagnostic tests, order testing, and receive reports that are necessary to his or her practice of midwifery and consistent with his or her scope of practice.

(g) This article does not authorize a midwife to practice medicine or to perform surgery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 3.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2508.

(a) A licensed midwife shall disclose in oral and written form to a prospective client as part of a client care plan, and obtain informed consent for, all of the following:

(1) All of the provisions of Section 2507.

(2) The client is retaining a licensed midwife, not a certified nurse-midwife, and the licensed midwife is not supervised by a physician and surgeon.

(3) The licensed midwife’s current licensure status and license number.

(4) The practice settings in which the licensed midwife
 practices.

(5) If the licensed midwife does not have liability coverage for the practice of midwifery, he or she shall disclose that fact. The licensed midwife shall disclose to the client that many physicians and surgeons do not have liability insurance coverage for services provided to someone having a planned out-of-hospital birth.

(6) The acknowledgment that if the client is advised to consult with a physician and surgeon, failure to do so may affect the client’s legal rights in any professional negligence actions against a physician and surgeon, licensed health care professional, or hospital.

(7) There are conditions that are outside of the scope of practice of a licensed midwife that will result in a referral for a consultation from, or transfer of care to, a physician and surgeon.

(8) The specific arrangements for the referral of complications to a physician and surgeon for consultation. The licensed midwife shall not be required to identify a specific physician and surgeon.

(9) The specific arrangements for the transfer of care during the prenatal period, hospital transfer during the intrapartum and postpartum periods, and access to appropriate emergency medical services for mother and baby if necessary, and recommendations for preregistration at a hospital that has obstetric emergency services and is most likely to receive the transfer.

(10) If, during the course of care, the client is informed that she has or may have a condition indicating the need for a mandatory transfer, the licensed midwife shall initiate the transfer.

(11) The availability of the text of laws regulating licensed midwifery practices and the procedure for reporting complaints to the Medical Board of California, which may be found on the Medical Board of California’s Internet Web site.

(12) Consultation with a physician and surgeon does not alone create a physician-patient relationship or any other relationship with the physician and surgeon. The informed consent shall specifically state that the licensed midwife and the consulting physician and surgeon are not employees, partners, associates, agents, or principals of one another. The licensed midwife shall inform the patient that he or she is independently licensed and practicing midwifery and in that regard is solely responsible for the services he or she provides.

(b) The disclosure and consent shall be signed by both the licensed midwife and the client and a copy
 of the disclosure and consent shall be placed in the client’s medical record.

(c) The Medical Board of California may prescribe the form for the written disclosure and informed consent statement required to be used by a licensed midwife under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 665, Sec. 3.   (AB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2509.

The board shall create and appoint a Midwifery Advisory Council consisting of licensees of the board in good standing, who need not be members of the board, and members of the public who have an interest in midwifery practice, including, but not limited to, home births. At least one-half of the council members shall be California licensed midwives. The council shall make recommendations on matters specified by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 536, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2510.

If a client is transferred to a hospital, the licensed midwife shall provide records, including prenatal records, and speak with the receiving physician and surgeon about labor up to the point of the transfer. The hospital shall report each transfer of a planned out-of-hospital birth to the Medical Board of California and the California Maternal Quality Care Collaborative using a standardized form developed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 665, Sec. 4.   (AB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2511.

(a) No person, other than one who has been licensed to practice midwifery by the board, shall hold himself or herself out as a licensed midwife, or use any other term indicating or implying that he or she is a licensed midwife.

(b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit in any manner the practice of an individual to whom a certificate has been issued pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746) of Chapter 6, or to prevent an individual to whom a certificate has been issued pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746) of Chapter 6 from holding himself or herself out as a certified nurse-midwife, nurse midwife, midwife, or from using the initials “CNM.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2511.5.

Each application for licensure as a licensed midwife shall be made upon an online electronic form, or other form, provided by the board, and each application form shall contain a legal verification by the applicant certifying under penalty of perjury that the information provided by the applicant is true and correct and that any information in supporting documents provided by the applicant is true and correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 27.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2512.

The board shall issue a license to practice midwifery to all applicants who meet the requirements of this article and who pay the fee required by Section 2520.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2512.5.

A person is qualified for a license to practice midwifery when he or she satisfies one of the following requirements:

(a) (1) Successful completion of a three-year postsecondary midwifery education program accredited by an accrediting organization approved by the board. Upon successful completion of the education requirements of this article, the applicant shall successfully complete a comprehensive licensing examination adopted by the board which is equivalent, but not identical, to the examination given by the American College of Nurse Midwives. The examination for licensure as a midwife may be conducted by the Division of Licensing under a uniform examination system, and the division may contract with organizations to administer the examination in order to carry out this purpose. The Division of Licensing may, in its discretion, designate additional written examinations for midwifery licensure that the division determines are equivalent to the examination given by the American College of Nurse Midwives.

(2) The midwifery education program curriculum shall consist of not less than 84 semester units or 126 quarter units. The course of instruction shall be presented in semester or quarter units under the following formula:

(A) One hour of instruction in the theory each week throughout a semester or quarter equals one unit.

(B) Three hours of clinical practice each week throughout a semester or quarter equals one unit.

(3) The midwifery education program shall provide both academic and clinical preparation equivalent, but not identical to that provided in programs accredited by the American College of Nurse Midwives, which shall include, but not be limited to, preparation in all of the following areas:

(A) The art and science of midwifery, one-half of which shall be in theory and one-half of which shall be in clinical practice. Theory and clinical practice shall be concurrent in the areas of maternal and child health, including, but not limited to, labor and delivery, neonatal well care, and postpartum care.

(B) Communications skills that include the principles of oral, written, and group communications.

(C) Anatomy and physiology, genetics, obstetrics and gynecology, embryology and fetal development, neonatology, applied microbiology, chemistry, child growth and development, pharmacology, nutrition, laboratory diagnostic tests and procedures, and physical assessment.

(D) Concepts in psychosocial, emotional, and cultural aspects of maternal and child care, human sexuality, counseling and teaching, maternal and infant and family bonding process, breast feeding, family planning, principles of preventive health, and community health.

(E) Aspects of the normal pregnancy, labor and delivery, postpartum period, newborn care, family planning or routine gynecological care in alternative birth centers, homes, and hospitals.

(F) The following shall be integrated throughout the entire curriculum:

(i) Midwifery process.

(ii) Basic intervention skills in preventive, remedial, and supportive midwifery.

(iii) The knowledge and skills required to develop collegial relationships with health care providers from other disciplines.

(iv) Related behavioral and social sciences with emphasis on societal and cultural patterns, human development, and behavior related to maternal and child health, illness, and wellness.

(G) Instruction shall also be given in personal hygiene, client abuse, cultural diversity, and the legal, social, and ethical aspects of midwifery.

(H) The program shall include the midwifery management process, which shall include all of the following:

(i) Obtaining or updating a defined and relevant data base for assessment of the health status of the client.

(ii) Identifying problems based upon correct interpretation of the data base.

(iii) Preparing a defined needs or problem list, or both, with corroboration from the client.

(iv) Consulting, collaborating with, and referring to, appropriate members of the health care team.

(v) Providing information to enable clients to make appropriate decisions and to assume appropriate responsibility for their own health.

(vi) Assuming direct responsibility for the development of comprehensive, supportive care for the client and with the client.

(vii) Assuming direct responsibility for implementing the plan of care.

(viii) Initiating appropriate measures for obstetrical and neonatal emergencies.

(ix) Evaluating, with corroboration from the client, the achievement of health care goals and modifying the plan of care appropriately.

(b) Successful completion of an educational program that the board has determined satisfies the criteria of subdivision (a) and current licensure as a midwife by a state with licensing standards that have been found by the board to be equivalent to those adopted by the board pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 655, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2513.

(a) An approved midwifery education program shall offer the opportunity for students to obtain credit by examination for previous midwifery education and clinical experience. The applicant shall demonstrate, by practical examination, the clinical competencies described in Section 2514 or established by regulation pursuant to Section 2514.5. The midwifery education program’s credit by examination policy shall be approved by the board, and shall be available to applicants upon request. The proficiency and practical examinations shall be approved by the board. Beginning January 1, 2015, new licensees shall not substitute clinical experience for formal didactic education.

(b) Completion
 of clinical experiences shall be verified by a licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife, and a physician and surgeon, all of whom shall be current in the knowledge and practice of obstetrics and midwifery. Physicians and surgeons, licensed midwives, and certified nurse-midwives who participate in the verification and evaluation of an applicant’s clinical experiences shall show evidence of current practice. The method used to verify clinical experiences shall be approved by the board.

(c) Upon successful completion of the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2), the applicant shall also complete the licensing examination described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2512.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 665, Sec. 5.   (AB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2513.5.

The Medical Board of California shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants for a midwife license, as defined by Section 2507, to determine whether the applicant has a criminal conviction record in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries, pursuant to Section 2042. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code for the board to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial of licensure under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 9.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2514.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a bona fide student from engaging in the practice of midwifery in this state, as part of his or her course of study, if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The student is under the supervision of a licensed midwife or certified nurse-midwife, who holds a clear and unrestricted license in this state, who is present on the premises at all times client services are provided, and who is practicing pursuant to Section 2507 or 2746.5, or a physician and surgeon.

(2) The client is informed of the student’s status.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a “bona fide student” means an individual who is enrolled and participating in a midwifery education program or who is enrolled in a program of supervised clinical training as part of the instruction of a three year postsecondary midwifery education program approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 515, Sec. 17.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2514.5.

(a) Within 60 days following January 1, 1998, the board shall adopt regulations setting forth educational requirements. To develop these regulations, the board shall update the educational requirements set forth in Sections 2512.5, 2513, and 2514. These updated sections shall reflect national standards for the practice of midwifery and shall be subject to public hearings prior to adoption. The board shall review and update the regulations every two years.

(b) The board shall adopt the written examination required by this article by July 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2515.

The board shall approve specific educational programs intended to meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 2512.5 and Section 2514 for the course of academic study, documentation of experience and skill, and clinical evaluation. These programs shall also be accredited by an accrediting organization approved by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2515.5.

Each applicant shall show by evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she has met the educational standards established by the board pursuant to this article or the equivalent thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2516.

(a) Each licensed midwife who assists, or supervises a student midwife in assisting, in childbirth that occurs in an out-of-hospital setting shall annually report to the Department of Health Care Access and Information. The report shall be submitted no later than March 30, for the prior calendar year, in a form specified by the board and shall contain all of the following:

(1) The midwife’s name and license number.

(2) The calendar year being reported.

(3) The following information with regard to cases in California in which the midwife, or the student midwife supervised
 by the midwife, assisted during the previous year when the intended place of birth at the onset of care was an out-of-hospital setting:
